Connecticut, session 2026, SB00182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended (1) to exempt
Social Security benefits for all taxpayers from the personal income tax,
or (2) to require the qualifying income thresholds for personal income
tax deductions for Social Security benefits be adjusted in accordance
with any change in the consumer price index.